Vermont, session 2025-2026, H696.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendments to the charter of the Town
of Bennington as set forth in this act. The voters approved the proposal of
amendment on March 4, 2025.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 103 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 103. TOWN OF BENNINGTON
* * *
VT LEG #383310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.696
2026 Page 2 of 2
§ 807. PRIORITY OF MUNICIPAL LIENS
The filing of a notice of lien resulting from a judgment by a court of
competent jurisdiction for fines in an enforcement proceeding under the
Town’s Land Use Regulations; Property Maintenance Ordinance; or Housing,
Building, and Life Safety Ordinance shall have priority in law over any other
lien having priority in time. The underlying enforcement lien shall remain a
valid and subsisting lien upon the real property until the fines are fully paid or
otherwise discharged, but not longer than eight years from the date of the
judgment, unless it shall have been renewed pursuant to State law.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage
VT LEG #383310 v.1